Alaska, session 34, HB228.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 03 * Section 1. AS 44.12 is amended by adding a new section to read: 04 Sec. 44.12.158. Jewish Heritage Month. The month of October each year is 05 established as Jewish Heritage Month. Jewish Heritage Month may be observed with 06 appropriate ceremonies, educational activities, and public recognition of the 07 contributions of past and present Jewish residents of the state. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.